California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) An insurer that requests an applicant to take a genetic characteristic test shall obtain the applicant’s written informed consent for the test. Written informed consent shall include a description of the test to be performed, including its purpose, potential uses, and limitations, the meaning of its results, procedures for notifying the applicant of the results, and the right to confidential treatment of the results.

(b) The insurer shall notify an applicant of a test result by notifying the applicant or the applicant’s designated physician. If the applicant tested has not given written consent authorizing a physician to receive the test results, the applicant shall be urged, at the time the applicant is informed of the test results, to contact a health care professional.

(c) The commissioner shall develop and adopt standardized language for the informed consent disclosure form required by this section to be given to any applicant for life or disability income insurance who takes a test for a genetic characteristic.

(d) A life or disability income insurer shall not require a person to undergo a test of the person’s genetic characteristics unless the cost of the test is paid by the insurer.

(e) No policy shall limit benefits otherwise payable if loss is caused or contributed to by the presence or absence of genetic characteristics, except to the extent and in the same fashion as the insurer limits coverage for loss caused or contributed to by other medical conditions presenting an increased degree of risk.

(f) Nothing in this chapter shall limit an insurer’s right to decline an application or enrollment request for a life or disability income insurance policy, charge a higher rate or premium for such a policy, or place a limitation on coverage under such a policy, on the basis of manifestations of any disease or disorder.

(g) No discrimination shall be made in the fees or commissions of agents or brokers writing or renewing a life or disability income policy on the basis of a test of that person’s genetic characteristics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 521, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10149.

(a) All underwriting activities undertaken by insurers pursuant to this article shall be subject to all applicable provisions of Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(b) No life or disability income insurer shall require a genetic characteristic test if the results of the test would be used exclusively or nonexclusively for the purpose of determining eligibility for hospital, medical, or surgical insurance coverage or eligibility for coverage under a nonprofit hospital service plan or health care service plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 761, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10149.1.

(a) This section shall apply to the disclosure of the results of a test for a genetic characteristic requested by an insurer pursuant to this article.

(b) Any person who negligently discloses results of a test for a genetic characteristic to any third party, in a manner which identifies or provides identifying characteristics of the person to whom the test results apply, except pursuant to a written authorization, as described in subdivision (g), or except as provided in this article or in Sections 1603.1 and 1603.3 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) plus court costs, as determined by the court, which penalty and costs shall be paid to the subject of the test.

(c) Any person who willfully discloses the results of a test for a genetic characteristic to any third party, in a manner which identifies or provides identifying characteristics of the person to whom the test results apply, except pursuant to a written authorization, as described in subdivision (g), or except as provided in this article or in Sections 1603.1 and 1603.3 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and no more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) plus court costs, as determined by the court, which penalty and costs shall be paid to the subject of the test.

(d) Any person who willfully or negligently discloses the results of a test for a genetic characteristic to a third party, in a manner which identifies or provides identifying characteristics of the person to whom the test results apply, except pursuant to a written authorization, as described in subdivision (g), or except as provided in this article or in Sections 1603.1 and 1603.3 of the Health and Safety Code, which results in economic, bodily, or emotional harm to the subject of the test, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not to exceed one year, by a fine of not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(e) Any person who commits any act described in subdivision (b) or (c) shall be liable to the subject for all actual damages, including damages for economic, bodily, or emotional harm which is proximately caused by the act.

(f) Each disclosure made in violation of this section is a separate and actionable offense.

(g) The applicant’s “written authorization,” as used in this section, applies only to the disclosure of test results by a person responsible for the care and treatment of the person subject to the test. Written authorization is required for each separate disclosure of the test results, and shall include to whom the disclosure would be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 761, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Policy Provisions Required [10150. - 10154.]

10150.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to annuities, industrial policies or to term contracts issued for periods of twenty years or less.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10150.1.

This article is not applicable to life policies issued on or after the operative date as to such policies of Article 3a, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 955.)
-------------------------------------------

10151.

Every contract or policy of life insurance (excluding additional benefits specified therein or issued in connection therewith for accidental death or disability) hereinafter made by any person or corporation, with and upon the life of a resident of this State, and delivered within this State, shall provide, in event of default of any premium payment after three full annual premiums shall have been paid on such policy, that without any action on the part of the insured, the net value of such policy based upon the reserve basis used in computing the premiums and values thereunder (the policy to specify the mortality table and rate of interest so adopted) which net value shall be at least equal to its entire net reserve at the date of default, including that of dividend additions, if any, based upon a standard not lower than the American experience tables of mortality with interest at three and one-half per cent yearly, less a surrender charge of not more than two and one-half per cent of the face amount of the policy and of any existing dividend additions thereto and less any indebtedness to the company on or secured by the policy, shall be applied as a single premium to the purchase of one of the following stipulated forms of insurance:

First. Paid-up participating or nonparticipating term insurance in the amount of the face of the policy, plus dividend additions, if any, for such a period as the net value outlined above will purchase at the net single premium, at the attained age of the insured at the time of the lapse, based upon the reserve basis described in the policy; provided, however, that under endowment contracts the term shall not extend beyond the endowment period named in the original contract, and the excess value, if any, shall be applied as a net single premium to purchase in the same manner paid-up pure endowment insurance, payable at the end of the endowment period named in the contract if the insured be then living, or, 

Second. Paid-up participating or nonparticipating term insurance in the amount of the face of the policy, plus dividend additions, if any, and less any outstanding indebtedness, for such a period as the net value outlined above will purchase at the net single premium, at the attained age of the insured, based upon the reserve basis described in the policy; provided, however, that under endowment contracts the term shall not extend beyond the endowment period named in the original contract, and the excess value, if any, shall be applied as a net single premium to purchase in the same manner paid-up pure endowment insurance, payable at the end of the endowment period named in the contract if the insured be then living, or

Third. Paid-up participating or nonparticipating insurance payable at the time and on the conditions named in the policy for such an amount as the net value outlined above will purchase at the net single premium, at the attained age of the insured, based upon the reserve basis described in the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

10152.

In lieu of the application of the provisions for automatic insurance upon nonpayment of premium the policy may be surrendered to the insurer at its home office, upon due application by the legal owner thereof, within one month after date of premium default for a specified cash value which shall be at least equal to the sum which would be otherwise available for the purchase of the automatic form of insurance provided therein. The insurer may defer payment of such cash value for not more than six months after application therefor is made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10153.

No agreement between the insurer and the policy holder or applicant for insurance contrary to the foregoing shall be held to waive any of the provisions of sections 10151 and 10152.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10154.

Any life policy issued upon the life of a resident of this State and delivered within this State, which does not contain an automatic nonforfeiture value in conformity with section 10151 shall be construed as granting the nonparticipating term insurance as provided in paragraph first of section 10151. Such a benefit shall be read into the policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3a. Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance [10159.1. - 10167.5.]

10159.1.

(a) This article is applicable only to policies and contracts issued on or after the operative date as to such policies or contracts of this article.

(b) The term “operative date of the valuation manual” means the January 1 of the first calendar year that the valuation manual, as defined in Section 10489.1, is effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 1.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10159.2.

After December 31, 1943, any insurer may file with the commissioner a written notice of its election to comply with the provisions of this article as to any or all of its policies after a specified date before January 1, 1948. After the filing of such notice, then upon such specified date, this article shall become operative with respect to the policies specified in the notice and which are thereafter issued by such insurer. As to all of its policies with respect to which an insurer makes no such election, the operative date of this article shall be January 1, 1948.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 955.)
-------------------------------------------

10160.

Except as provided in Section 10165, no policy of life insurance shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless it shall contain in substance the following provisions, or corresponding provisions which are at least as favorable to the defaulting or surrendering policyholder as are the minimum requirements hereinafter specified and are essentially in compliance with Section 10164.1 of this law:

(a) That, in the event of default in any premium payment after premiums have been paid for at least one full year the insurer will grant, upon proper request not later than 60 days after the due date of the premium in default, a paid-up nonforfeiture benefit on a plan stipulated in the policy, effective as of such due date, of such amount as may be hereinafter specified. In lieu of this stipulated paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, the company may substitute, upon proper request not later than 60 days after the due date of the premium in default, an actuarially equivalent alternative paid-up nonforfeiture benefit which provides a greater amount or longer period of death benefits or, if applicable, a greater amount or earlier payment of endowment benefits.

(b) That, upon surrender of the policy within 60 days after the due date of any premium payment in default after premiums have been paid for at least three full years in the case of ordinary insurance or five full years in the case of industrial insurance, the insurer will pay, in lieu of any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, a cash surrender value of such amount as may be hereinafter specified.

(c) That a specified paid-up nonforfeiture benefit shall become effective as specified in the policy unless the person entitled to make such election elects another available option not later than 60 days after the due date of the premium in default.

(d) That, if the policy shall have become paid-up by completion of all premium payments or if it is continued under any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit which became effective on or after the third policy anniversary in the case of ordinary insurance or the fifth policy anniversary in the case of industrial insurance, the insurer will pay, upon surrender of the policy within 30 days after any policy anniversary, a cash surrender value of such amount as may be hereinafter specified.

(e) In the case of policies which cause, on a basis guaranteed in the policy, unscheduled changes in benefits or premiums, or which provide an option for changes in benefits or premiums other than a change to a new policy, a statement of the mortality table, interest rate, and method used in calculating cash surrender values and the paid-up nonforfeiture benefits available under the policy. In the case of all other policies, a statement of the mortality table and interest rate used in calculating the cash surrender values and the paid-up nonforfeiture benefits available under the policy, together with a schedule showing the cash surrender value, if any, and paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, if any, available under the policy on each policy anniversary either during the first 20 policy years or during the term of the policy, whichever is shorter, such values and benefits to be calculated upon the assumption that there are no dividends or paid-up additions credited to the policy and that there is no indebtedness to the insurer on account of or secured by the policy. At the option of the insurer such schedule may also show such values and benefits for any year or years beyond the twentieth policy year.

(f) A brief and general statement of the method to be used in calculating the cash surrender value and the paid-up nonforfeiture benefit available under the policy on any policy anniversary beyond the last anniversary for which such values and benefits are consecutively shown in the policy with an explanation of the manner in which the cash surrender values and the paid-up nonforfeiture benefits are altered by the existence of any paid-up additions credited to the policy or any indebtedness to the insurer on account of or secured by the policy.

Any of the foregoing provisions or portions thereof not applicable by reason of the plan of insurance may, to the extent inapplicable, be omitted from the policy.

The insurer shall reserve the right to defer the payment of any cash surrender value for a period of six months after demand therefor with surrender of the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 767, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10161.

Any cash surrender value available under the policy in the event of default in a premium payment due on any policy anniversary, whether or not required by Section 10160, shall be an amount not less than the excess, if any, of the present value, on such anniversary, of the future guaranteed benefits which would have been provided for by the policy, including any existing paid-up additions, if there had been no default, over the sum of (a) the then present value of the adjusted premiums as defined in Sections 10163, 10163.1, and 10163.2 corresponding to premiums which would have fallen due on and after such anniversary, and (b) the amount of any indebtedness to the company on the policy.

Provided, however, that for any policy issued on or after January 1, 1989, which provides supplemental life insurance or annuity benefits at the option of the insured and for an identifiable additional premium by rider or supplemental policy provision, the cash surrender value referred to in the first paragraph of this section shall be an amount not less than the sum of the cash surrender value as defined in such paragraph for an otherwise similar policy issued at the same age without such rider or supplemental policy provision and the cash surrender value as defined in such paragraph for a policy which provides only the benefits otherwise provided by such rider or supplemental policy provision.

Provided, further, that for any family policy issued on or after January 1, 1989, which defines a primary insured and provides term insurance on the life of the spouse of the primary insured expiring before the spouse’s age of 71, the cash surrender value referred to in the first paragraph of this section shall be an amount not less than the sum of the cash surrender value as defined in such paragraph for an otherwise similar policy issued at the same age without such term insurance on the life of the spouse and the cash surrender value as defined in such paragraph for a policy which provides only the benefits otherwise provided by such term insurance on the life of the spouse.

Any cash surrender value available within 30 days after any policy anniversary under any policy paid up by completion of all premium payments or any policy continued under any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, whether or not required by Section 10160, shall be an amount not less than the present value, on such anniversary, of the future guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy, including any existing paid-up additions, decreased by any indebtedness to the company on the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 767, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10162.

Any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit available under the policy in the event of default in a premium payment due on any policy anniversary shall be such that its present value as of such anniversary shall be at least equal to the cash surrender value then provided for by the policy or, if none is provided for, that cash surrender value which would have been required by this article in the absence of the condition that premiums shall have been paid for at least a specified period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 955.)
-------------------------------------------

10163.

This section shall not apply to policies issued on or after the operative date of Section 10163.2 as defined therein. Except as provided in the third paragraph of this section, the adjusted premiums for any policy shall be calculated on an annual basis and shall be such uniform percentage of the respective premiums specified in the policy for each policy year, excluding extra premiums on a substandard policy, that the present value, at the date of issue of the policy, of all such adjusted premiums shall be equal to the sum of (i) the then present value of the future guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy; (ii) two percent (2%) of the amount of insurance, if the insurance be uniform in amount, or of the equivalent uniform amount, as hereinafter defined, if the amount of insurance varies with duration of the policy; (iii) forty percent (40%) of the adjusted premium for the first policy year; (iv) twenty-five percent (25%) of either the adjusted premium for the first policy year or the adjusted premium for a whole life policy of the same uniform or equivalent uniform amount with uniform premiums for the whole of life issued at the same age for the same amount of insurance, whichever is less. In applying the percentages specified in (iii) and (iv) above, no adjusted premium shall be deemed to exceed four percent (4%) of the amount of insurance or uniform amount equivalent thereto.

In the case of a policy providing an amount of insurance varying with duration of the policy, the equivalent uniform amount thereof for the purpose of this section shall be deemed to be the uniform amount of insurance provided by an otherwise similar policy, containing the same endowment benefit or benefits, if any, issued at the same age and for the same term, the amount of which does not vary with duration and the benefits under which have the same present value at the date of issue as the benefits under the policy, provided, however, that in the case of a policy providing a varying amount of insurance issued on the life of a child under age 10, the equivalent uniform amount may be computed as though the amount of insurance provided by the policy prior to the attainment of age 10 were the amount provided by such policy at age 10.

The adjusted premiums for any policy providing term insurance benefits by rider or supplemental policy provision unless such term insurance benefits are disregarded under Section 10164 shall be equal to (a) the adjusted premiums for an otherwise similar policy issued at the same age without such term insurance benefits, increased, during the period for which premiums for such term insurance benefits are payable, by (b) the adjusted premiums for such term insurance, the foregoing items (a) and (b) being calculated separately and as specified in the first two paragraphs of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 10163.1, all adjusted premiums and present values referred to in this article shall for all policies of ordinary insurance be calculated on the basis of the Commissioners 1941 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table; provided, however, that for any category of ordinary insurance issued on female risks, adjusted premiums and present values may be calculated, at the option of the insurer, according to an age not more than three years younger than the actual age of the insured, and such calculations for all policies of industrial insurance shall be made on the basis of the 1941 Standard Industrial Mortality Table. All calculations shall be made on the basis of the rate of interest, not exceeding three and one-half percent (312%) per annum, specified in the policy for calculating cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits. However, in calculating the present value of any paid-up term insurance with accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a nonforfeiture benefit, the rates of mortality assumed may be not more than one hundred thirty percent (130%) of the rates of mortality according to such applicable table; and for insurance issued on a substandard basis, the calculation of any such adjusted premiums and present values may be based on such other table of mortality as may be specified by the insurer and approved by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 767, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

10163.1.

(a) In the case of ordinary policies issued on or after the operative date of this subdivision as defined herein, all adjusted premiums and present values referred to in this article shall be calculated on the basis of the Commissioners 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table and the rate of interest specified in the policy for calculating cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits, provided that such rate of interest shall not exceed 312 percent per annum except that a rate of interest not exceeding 4 percent per annum may be used for all policies issued on or after January 1, 1970, and prior to January 1, 1980, and a rate of interest not exceeding 512 percent per annum may be used for all such policies issued on or after January 1, 1980, except that for any single premium whole life or endowment insurance policy a rate of interest not exceeding 612 percent per annum may be used; provided, that for any category of ordinary insurance issued on female risks, adjusted premiums and present values may be calculated according to an age not more than six years younger than the actual age of the insured; provided, however, that in calculating the present value of any paid-up term insurance with accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a nonforfeiture benefit, the rates of mortality assumed may be not more than those shown in the Commissioners 1958 Extended Term Insurance Table; provided further, that for insurance issued on a substandard basis, the calculation of any such adjusted premiums and present values may be based on such other table of mortality as may be specified by the company and approved by the commissioner.

On or after January 1, 1961, any company may file with the commissioner a written notice of its election to comply with the provisions of this subdivision after a specified date before January 1, 1966. After the filing of such notice, then upon such specified date (which shall be the operative date of this subdivision for such company), this subdivision shall become operative with respect to the ordinary policies thereafter issued by such company. If a company makes no such election, the operative date of this subdivision for such company shall be January 1, 1966.

(b) In the case of industrial policies issued on or after the operative date of this subdivision as defined herein, all adjusted premiums and present values referred to in this article shall be calculated on the basis of the Commissioners 1961 Standard Industrial Mortality Table and the rate of interest specified in the policy for calculating cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits, provided that such rate of interest shall not exceed 312 percent per annum except that a rate of interest not exceeding 4 percent per annum may be used for all such policies issued on or after January 1, 1970, and prior to January 1, 1980, and a rate of interest not exceeding 512 percent per annum may be used for all such policies issued on or after January 1, 1980, except that for any single premium whole life or endowment insurance policy a rate of interest not exceeding 612 percent per annum may be used. Provided, however, that in calculating the present value of any paid-up term insurance with accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a nonforfeiture benefit, the rates of mortality assumed may be not more than those shown in the Commissioners 1961 Industrial Extended Term Insurance Table. Provided, further, that for insurance issued on a substandard basis, the calculation of any such adjusted premiums and present values may be based on such other table of mortality as may be specified by the company and approved by the commissioner.

After September 20, 1963, any company may file with the commissioner a written notice of its election to comply with the provisions of this subdivision after a specified date before January 1, 1968. After the filing of such notice, then upon such specified date (which shall be the operative date of this subdivision for such company), this subdivision shall become operative with respect to the industrial policies thereafter issued by such company. If a company makes no such election, the operative date of this subdivision for such company shall be January 1, 1968.

This section shall not apply to ordinary or industrial policies issued on or after the operative date of Section 10163.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 940, Sec. 1.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

10163.2.

(a) This section shall apply to all policies issued on or after the operative date of this section as defined herein. Except as provided in subdivision (g), the adjusted premiums for any policy shall be calculated on an annual basis and shall be such uniform percentage of the respective premiums specified in the policy for each policy year, excluding amounts payable as extra premiums to cover impairments or special hazards and also excluding any uniform annual contract charge or policy fee specified in the policy in a statement of the method to be used in calculating the cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits, that the present value, at the date of issue of the policy, of all adjusted premiums shall be equal to the sum of (1)
 the then present value of the future guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy; (2) 1 percent of either the amount of insurance, if the insurance is uniform in amount, or the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the first 10 policy years; and (3) 125 percent of the nonforfeiture net level premium as hereinafter defined. Provided, however, that in applying the percentage specified in (3) no nonforfeiture net level premium shall be deemed to exceed 4 percent of either the amount of insurance, if the insurance is uniform in amount, or the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the first 10 policy years. The date of issue of a policy for the purpose of this section shall be the date as of which the rated age of the insured is determined.

(b) The nonforfeiture net level premium shall be equal to the present value, at the date of issue of the policy, of the guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy,
 divided by the present value, at the date of issue of the policy, of an annuity of 1 percent per annum payable on the date of issue of the policy and on each anniversary of such policy on which a premium falls due.

(c) In the case of policies that cause on a basis guaranteed in the policy, unscheduled changes in benefits or premiums, or that provide an option for changes in benefits or premiums other than a change to a new policy, the adjusted premiums and present values shall initially be calculated on the assumption that future benefits and premiums do not change from those stipulated at the date of issue of the policy. At the time of any such change in the benefits or premiums, the future adjusted premiums, nonforfeiture net level premiums, and present values shall be recalculated on the assumption that future benefits and premiums do not change from those stipulated by the policy immediately after the change.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), the recalculated future adjusted premiums for any such policy shall be such uniform percentage of the respective future premiums specified in the policy for each policy year, excluding amounts payable as extra premiums to cover impairments and special hazards, and also excluding any uniform annual contract charge or policy fee specified in the policy in a statement of the method to be used in calculating the cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits, that the present value, at the time of change to the newly defined benefits or premiums, of all such future adjusted premiums shall be equal to the excess of (1) the sum of (A) the then present value of the then future guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy and (B) the additional expense allowance, if any, over (2) the then cash surrender value, if any, or present value of any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit under the
 policy.

(e) The additional expense allowance, at the time of the change to the newly defined benefits or premiums, shall be the sum of (1) 1 percent of the excess, if positive, of the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the first 10 policy years subsequent to the change over the average amount of insurance prior to the change at the beginning of each of the first 10 policy years subsequent to the time of the most recent previous change, or, if there has been no previous change, the date of issue of the policy; and (2) 125 percent of the increase, if positive, in the nonforfeiture net level premium.

(f) The recalculated nonforfeiture net level premium shall be equal to the result obtained by dividing (1) by (2) where:

(1) It equals the sum of:

(A) The nonforfeiture net level premium applicable prior to the change times the present value of an annuity of 1 percent per annum payable on each anniversary of the policy on or subsequent to the date of the change on which a premium would have fallen due had the change not occurred, and

(B) The present value of the increase in future guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy, and

(2) It equals the present value of an annuity of 1 percent per annum payable on each anniversary of the policy on or subsequent to the date of change on which a premium falls due.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, in the case of a policy issued on a substandard basis that provides reduced graded amounts of insurance so that, in each policy year, such policy has the same tabular
 mortality cost as an otherwise similar policy issued on the standard basis that provides higher uniform amounts of insurance, adjusted premiums and present values for such substandard policy may be calculated as if it were issued to provide such higher uniform amounts of insurance on the standard basis.

(h) All adjusted premiums and present values referred to in this article shall for all policies of ordinary insurance be calculated on the basis of (1) the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table or (2) at the election of the company for any one or more specified plans of life insurance, the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table with Ten-Year Select Mortality Factors; shall for all policies of industrial insurance be calculated on the basis of the Commissioners 1961 Standard Industrial Mortality Table; and shall for all policies issued in a particular calendar year be calculated on the basis of a rate of interest not
 exceeding the nonforfeiture interest rate as defined in this section for policies issued in that calendar year. Provided, however, that:

(1) At the option of the company, calculations for all policies issued in a particular calendar year may be made on the basis of a rate of interest not exceeding the nonforfeiture interest rate, as defined in this section, for policies issued in the immediately preceding calendar year.

(2) Under any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, including any paid-up dividend additions, any cash surrender value available, whether or not required by Section 10160, shall be calculated on the basis of the mortality table and rate of interest used in determining the amount of such paid-up nonforfeiture benefit and paid-up dividend additions, if any.

(3) A company may calculate the amount of any
 guaranteed paid-up nonforfeiture benefit including any paid-up additions under the policy on the basis of an interest rate no lower than that specified in the policy for calculating cash surrender values.

(4) In calculating the present value of any paid-up term insurance with accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a nonforfeiture benefit, the rates of mortality assumed may be not more than those shown in the Commissioners 1980 Extended Term Insurance Table for policies of ordinary insurance and not more than the Commissioners 1961 Industrial Extended Term Insurance Table for policies of industrial insurance.

(5) For insurance issued on a substandard basis, the calculation of any such adjusted premiums and present values may be based on appropriate modifications of the aforementioned tables.

(6) (A) For policies issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual, any Commissioners Standard Ordinary mortality tables, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC), or its successor, that are approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard may be substituted for the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table with or without Ten-Year Select Mortality Factors or for the Commissioners 1980 Extended Term Insurance Table.

(B) For policies issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual, the valuation manual shall provide the Commissioners Standard mortality table for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard that may be substituted for the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table with or without Ten-Year Select Mortality Factors or for the Commissioners 1980
 Extended Term Insurance Table. If the commissioner approves by regulation any Commissioners Standard Ordinary mortality table adopted by the NAIC for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard for policies issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual then that minimum nonforfeiture standard supersedes the minimum nonforfeiture standard provided by the valuation manual.

(7) (A) For policies issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual, any Commissioners Standard Industrial mortality tables, adopted after 1980 by the NAIC, or its successor, that are approved by regulation promulgated or bulletin issued by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard may be substituted for the Commissioners 1961 Standard Industrial Mortality Table or the Commissioners 1961 Industrial Extended Term Insurance Table.

(B) For policies issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual, the valuation manual shall provide the Commissioners Standard mortality table for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard that may be substituted for the Commissioners 1961 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table or the Commissioners 1961 Industrial Extended Term Insurance Table. If the commissioner approves by regulation any Commissioners Standard Ordinary mortality table adopted by the NAIC for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard for policies issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual then that minimum nonforfeiture standard supersedes the minimum nonforfeiture standard provided by the valuation manual.

(i) The nonforfeiture interest rate.

(1) For policies issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual, the nonforfeiture interest
 rate per annum for any policy issued in a particular calendar year shall be equal to 125 percent of the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for the policy as defined in the Standard Valuation Law, rounded to the nearer one-fourth of 1 percent, provided, however, that the nonforfeiture interest rate shall not be less than 4 percent.

(2) For policies issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual, the nonforfeiture interest rate per annum for any policy issued in a particular calendar year shall be provided by the valuation manual.
